test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-kerge5_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - `kerge: # Noun (5) `kerge 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kerge+A+Sg+Nom: kerge
     kerge+A+Sg+Gen: kerge
     kerge+A+Sg+Par: kerget
     kerge+A+Sg+Ill: [kergehe, kergede]
     kerge+A+Sg+Ine: [kergen, kergeh, kergehn]
     kerge+A+Sg+Ela: kergest
     kerge+A+Sg+All: kergele
     kerge+A+Sg+Ade: kergel
     kerge+A+Sg+Abl: kergelt
     kerge+A+Sg+Tra: kerges
     kerge+A+Sg+Ter: kergeniq
     kerge+A+Sg+Abe: kergeldäq
     kerge+A+Sg+Com: kergegaq
     kerge+A+Pl+Nom: kergeq
     kerge+A+Pl+Gen: [kergide, kergiide]
     kerge+A+Pl+Par: [kergit, kergiid]
     kerge+A+Pl+Ill: [kergihe, kergiihe, kergide, kergiide]
     kerge+A+Pl+Ine: [kergin, kergih, kergihn, kergiin, kergiih, kergiihn]
     kerge+A+Pl+Ela: [kergist, kergiist]
     kerge+A+Pl+All: [kergile, kergiile]
     kerge+A+Pl+Ade: [kergil, kergiil]
     kerge+A+Pl+Abl: [kergilt, kergiilt]
     kerge+A+Pl+Tra: [kergis, kergiis]
     kerge+A+Pl+Ter: [kerginiq, kergiiniq]
     kerge+A+Pl+Abe: [kergildäq, kergiildäq]
     kerge+A+Pl+Com: [kergidegaq, kergiidegaq]
